Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,143
Smoke detector; number; location; operation.

The detector shall be mounted in accordance with the rules and regulations regarding the number and location of smoke detectors adopted by the State Fire Marshal. When activated, the detector shall provide an alarm in the dwelling unit, guest room, dormitory, or mobile home.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 12.